New York, session 2025-2026, A7941.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph f of subdivision 7 of 2 section 415 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 26 of 3 the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 4 (iii) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph or any 5 provision of paragraph (bb) of subdivision two of section four hundred 6 sixty-three of this title, the commissioner may [renew any certificate 7 of registration that was issued to a franchisor, manufacturer, distribu- 8 tor, distributor branch or factory branch, as such terms are defined in 9 section four hundred sixty-two of this title, or to any subsidiary, 10 affiliate or controlled entity thereof, prior to March twenty-sixth, two 11 thousand fourteen;] issue up to five total certificates of registration 12 to franchisors, manufacturers, distributors, distributor branches or 13 factory branches, as such terms are defined by section four hundred 14 sixty-two of this title, or to any subsidiaries, affiliates or 15 controlled entities thereof, provided, however, that: 16 (A) such [franchisor, manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch or 17 factory branch, or any subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity there- 18 of, is a manufacturer that manufactures or assembles exclusively zero 19 emissions vehicles, or is a subsidiary, affiliate, or controlled entity 20 of such a manufacturer] franchisors, manufacturers, distributors, 21 distributor branches or factory branches, or any subsidiaries, affil- 22 iates or controlled entities thereof, are manufacturers that manufacture 23 or assemble exclusively zero emissions vehicles, or are subsidiaries, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10900-02-5 A. 7941 2 1 affiliates, or controlled entities of such manufacturers; and [provided 2 further] 3 (B) in the case of renewal, that a controlling interest in such 4 original [franchisor, manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch or 5 factory branch or any subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity was not 6 transferred, sold or conveyed to another person or entity, other than to 7 a subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity of such franchisor, 8 manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch or factory branch] fran- 9 chisors, manufacturers, distributors, distributor branches or factory 10 branches or any subsidiaries, affiliates or controlled entities were not 11 transferred, sold or conveyed to another person or entity, other than to 12 a subsidiary, affiliate or controlled entity of such franchisors, 13 manufacturers, distributors, distributor branches or factory branches. 14 (2) Prior to July first, two thousand twenty-six, the commissioner 15 shall consider for renewal all certificates of registration issued under 16 clause one of subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph. Any such certif- 17 icates of registration issued prior to January first, two thousand twen- 18 ty-five, shall not be eligible for renewal. The commissioner may issue 19 up to five certificates of registration to entities defined under clause 20 one of subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, provided, however, that 21 such entities have not previously been issued a certificate of registra- 22 tion prior to January first, two thousand twenty-five. 23 (3) For purposes of this paragraph, "zero emission vehicles" shall 24 have the same meaning as under part two hundred eighteen of title six of 25 the New York code of rules and regulations. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.